New York, session 2025-2026, S687.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 355-f 2 to read as follows: 3 § 355-f. Establishment of a transitional pathway program. A transi- 4 tional pathway program may be created to encourage accessibility and 5 inclusivity in higher education for students with autism spectrum disor- 6 der. The state university may establish such program through the state 7 university office of disabilities, the office of university life and 8 other relevant departments. Such transitional pathway program may 9 include but not be limited to: 10 (a) the creation of a peer-support program with the special education, 11 psychology, social work, or other relevant department that would assign 12 a peer or trained mentor to a student with autism spectrum disorder to 13 provide academic support, social guidance and assistance with accommo- 14 dations. Such peer-support program may further include a plan to gradu- 15 ally increase independence as the student matriculates; 16 (b) the provision of accommodation policies and resources for students 17 with disabilities, particularly students with autism spectrum disorder, 18 via the school website and within application and orientation materials 19 for all current and prospective students; 20 (c) a separate orientation held for students with autism spectrum 21 disorder; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02760-01-5 S. 687 2 1 (d) the training of faculty and staff on school accommodation poli- 2 cies, procedures and best practices to assist students with autism spec- 3 trum disorder; 4 (e) an evaluation of current accommodation policies and procedures to 5 ensure legal compliance and assess if such considers the abilities and 6 limitations of students with autism spectrum disorder and modify if 7 needed. This may further include the establishment of protocol for the 8 parents and guardians of students with autism spectrum disorder to 9 provide assistance to the student as such student matriculates; and 10 (f) a mechanism for students with autism spectrum disorder to build 11 community and support each other which may include the provision of 12 quiet, low-stimulating areas on campus. 13 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6235 to read 14 as follows: 15 § 6235. Establishment of a transitional pathway program. A transi- 16 tional pathway program may be created to encourage accessibility and 17 inclusivity in higher education for students with autism spectrum disor- 18 der. The city university may establish such program through the city 19 university office of disabilities, the office of university life and 20 other relevant departments. Such transitional pathway program may 21 include but not be limited to: 22 (a) the creation of a peer-support program with the special education, 23 psychology, social work, or other relevant department that would assign 24 a peer or trained mentor to a student with autism spectrum disorder to 25 provide academic support, social guidance and assistance with accommo- 26 dations. Such peer-support program may further include a plan to gradu- 27 ally increase independence as the student matriculates; 28 (b) the provision of accommodation policies and resources for students 29 with disabilities, particularly students with autism spectrum disorder, 30 via the school website and within application and orientation materials 31 for all current and prospective students; 32 (c) a separate orientation held for students with autism spectrum 33 disorder; 34 (d) the training of faculty and staff on school accommodation poli- 35 cies, procedures and best practices to assist students with autism spec- 36 trum disorder; 37 (e) an evaluation of current accommodation policies and procedures to 38 ensure legal compliance and assess if such considers the abilities and 39 limitations of students with autism spectrum disorder and modify if 40 needed. This may further include the establishment of protocol for the 41 parents and guardians of students with autism spectrum disorder to 42 provide assistance to the student as such student matriculates; and 43 (f) a mechanism for students with autism spectrum disorder to build 44 community and support each other which may include the provision of 45 quiet, low-stimulating areas on campus. 46 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 47 the date on which it shall have become a law.